Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2253
Negative, defined.

Negative shall mean not infected as determined by the department based on results of an official test.

Laws 1986, LB 775, § 13;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 54-2213;

Laws 1991, LB 359, § 18.